NO.9 FAST IDLE/RUNS ON [MZ-CD 1.6 (Y6)]


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9

RUNS IDLE/RUNS ON

DESCRIPTION
•  The engine speed continues at fast idle after warm-up.
•  The engine runs after engine key is turned off.
POSSIBLE CAUSE
•  ECT sensor or related circuit malfunction
•  Accelerator pedal position sensor or related circuit malfunction
•  Idle switch or related circuit malfunction
•  Fuel metering valve malfunction
•  Fuel injector malfunction
•  Vacuum leakage
Предупреждение
The following troubleshooting flow chart contains the fuel system diagnosis and repair procedures. Read the following warnings before servicing the fuel system:
•  Fuel vapor is hazardous. It can easily ignite, causing serious injury and damage. Always keep sparks and flames away from fuel.
•  Fuel line spills and leakage are dangerous. Fuel can ignite and cause serious injury or death and damage. Fuel can also irritate skin and eyes. To prevent this, always complete “BEFORE REPAIR PROCEDURE” and “AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE” described in this manual.

Diagnostic Procedure

STEP

INSPECTION

RESULTS

ACTION

1
Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
Access the ECT PID.
Start and warm-up the engine to normal operating temperature.
Is the ECT PID reading between 82—112 °C {180—233 °F}?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
ECT PID is higher than 112 °C {233 °F}:
Go to symptom troubleshooting “NO.17 COOLING SYSTEM CONCERNS—OVERHEATING”.
ECT PID is less than 82 °C {180 °F}:
Go to symptom troubleshooting “NO.18 COOLING SYSTEM CONCERNS—RUNS COLD”.
2
Perform the self-test function using the M-MDS.
Turn the engine switch to the ON position.
Retrieve any DTC.
Are DTCs displayed?
Yes
DTC is displayed:
Go to the appropriate DTC test.
Communication error message is displayed:
Inspect for the following:
•  Open circuit between the PCM control relay and PCM terminals 236, 231
•  Open circuit between PCM control relay and PCM terminal 241
•  PCM control relay stuck open
•  Open or poor ground circuit (PCM terminal 307, 308, or 332)
•  Poorly connected vehicle body ground
No
No DTC is displayed:
Go to the next step.
3
Inspect fuel metering valve.
Is the fuel metering valve normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Replace the fuel pump.
4
Inspect the fuel injector.
Is the fuel injector normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Replace the fuel injector.
5
Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
Access the following PID.
•  APP
Verify that the PID value when the accelerator pedal is depressed and/or released.
Is the PID value normal?
Yes
Inspect for vacuum leakage.
No
Inspect and repair or replace the following part:
•  Accelerator pedal position sensor
6
Verify test results.
•  If normal, return to the diagnostic index to service any additional symptoms. (See SYMPTOM DIAGNOSTIC INDEX [MZ-CD 1.6 (Y6)].)
•  If the malfunction remains, inspect related Service Information and perform repair on diagnosis.
―  If the vehicle is repaired, troubleshooting is completed.
―  If the vehicle is not repaired or additional diagnostic information is not available, replace the PCM. (See PCM REMOVAL/INSTALLATION [MZ-CD 1.6 (Y6)].)